California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(d) Sections 15700 to 15702.1, inclusive, of the Government Code, relating to the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), relating to the Personal Income Tax Law.

(f) Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), relating to the Administration of Franchise and Income Taxes.

(g) Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), relating to the Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights.

(h) Part 18 (commencing with Section 38001), relating to the Multistate Tax Compact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 625.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Corporation Franchise Tax [23101. - 23364a.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [23101. - 23114.]

23101.

(a) “Doing business” means actively engaging in any transaction for the purpose of financial or pecuniary gain or profit.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, a taxpayer is doing business in this state for a taxable year if any of the following conditions has been satisfied:

(1) The taxpayer is organized or commercially domiciled in this state.

(2) Sales, as defined in subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 25120 as applicable for the taxable year, of the taxpayer in this state exceed the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or 25 percent of the taxpayer’s total sales. For purposes of this paragraph, sales of the taxpayer include sales by an agent or independent contractor of the taxpayer. For purposes of this paragraph, sales in this state shall be determined using the rules for assigning sales under Sections 25135 and 25136 and the regulations thereunder, as modified by regulations under Section 25137.

(3) The real property and tangible personal property of the taxpayer in this state exceed the lesser of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or 25 percent of the taxpayer’s total real
 property and tangible personal property. The value of real and tangible personal property and the determination of whether property is in this state shall be determined using the rules contained in Sections 25129 to 25131, inclusive, and the regulations thereunder, as modified by regulation under Section 25137.

(4) The amount paid in this state by the taxpayer for compensation, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 25120, exceeds the lesser of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or 25 percent of the total compensation paid by the taxpayer. Compensation in this state shall be determined using the rules for assigning payroll contained in Section 25133 and the regulations thereunder, as modified by regulations under Section 25137.

(c) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall annually revise the amounts in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (b) in accordance
 with subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(2) For purposes of the adjustment required by paragraph (1), subdivision (h) of Section 17041 shall be applied by substituting “2012” in lieu of “1988.”

(d) The sales, property, and payroll of the taxpayer include the taxpayer’s pro rata or distributive share of pass-through entities. For purposes of this subdivision, “pass-through entities” means a partnership or an “S” corporation.

(History: Amended November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

23101.5.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may determine that a corporation is not doing business in this state for purposes of this chapter or deriving income from sources within this state for purposes of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) if its only activities within this state are either or both of the following:

(1) The purchase of personal property or services solely for its own use or use by its affiliate outside this state if:

(A) The corporation does not have more than 100 employees in this state, whose duties are limited to solicitation, negotiation, liaison, monitoring, auditing, and inspecting the personal property or services acquired, or providing technical advice with respect to its requirements, and

(B) The corporation does not have more than 200 employees in this state, whose duties are limited to solicitation, negotiation, liaison, monitoring, auditing, and inspecting the personal property or services acquired, or providing technical advice with respect to its requirements, and the personal property or services purchased by the corporation or its affiliate are used for the construction or modification of a physical plant or facility located outside the state, and

(C) The combined number of employees in this state pursuant to
 subparagraphs (A) and (B) does not exceed 200.

(2) The presence of employees in this state only for the purpose of attending a public or private school, college, or university.

(b) A corporation may petition the Franchise Tax Board for a determination in accord with procedures established by the Franchise Tax Board. The filing of that petition shall be deemed a waiver of the confidentiality provisions of Section 19542 with respect to the facts alleged in the petition and any additional evidence produced with respect to those facts.

(c) If the determination is made, it shall remain in force for five years as long as the corporation continues to meet the above criteria. However, with respect to corporations meeting the above criteria on or before January 1, 1978, the determination shall remain in force indefinitely so
 long as the corporation continues to meet the above criteria.

(d) The corporation shall annually confirm with the Franchise Tax Board within two months and 15 days after the close of its fiscal year, in the manner as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe, that the facts relevant to the granting of the determination then in effect remain unchanged or shall state and explain any changes that have occurred since the preceding report was filed.

(e) Where a corporation applying for or relying on the determination is engaged in a unitary business, the limitation of 100 or 200 employees, as applicable, that is specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall apply to the aggregation of all corporations within the unitary group.

(f) Each taxpayer that sells property or services to a corporation with more than 100
 employees in this state, with respect to which the determination has been made, shall file annually with the Franchise Tax Board, in the manner as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe, a report identifying the number of its employees within this state directly attributable to the construction or modification of a physical plant or facility located outside the state.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1994.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 37.2) and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 37.5.   Effective October 6, 1993.   Section operative January 1, 1994, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23102.

Any corporation holding or organized to hold stock or bonds of any other corporation or corporations, and not trading in stock or bonds or other securities held, and engaging in no activities other than the receipt and disbursement of dividends from stock or interest from bonds, is not a corporation doing business in this State for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

23104.

(a) For purposes of this part only, any corporation that is not incorporated under the laws of this state and whose sole activity in this state is engaging in convention and trade show activities, as described in Section 513(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, for seven or fewer calendar days, or any portion thereof, during the taxable year and that does not derive more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of gross income reportable to this state from those activities during that taxable year is not a corporation doing business in
 this state.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of gross income reportable to this state of a taxpayer shall be made by including the gross income reportable to this state of each member of the “commonly controlled group” (as defined by Section 25105) of which the taxpayer is a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23113.

The tax imposed under this chapter shall attach whether a taxpayer has a taxable year of twelve months or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

23114.

(a) A corporation shall not be subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter if the corporation did no business in this state during the taxable year and the taxable year was 15 days or less.

(b) The period of time for which a corporation is not subject to taxes imposed by this chapter as provided in subdivision (a) may not be considered a taxable year for purposes of subdivision (e) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 455, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tax on General Corporations [23151. - 23156.]

23151.

(a) With the exception of banks and financial corporations, every corporation doing business within the limits of this state and not expressly exempted from taxation by the provisions of the Constitution of this state or by this part, shall annually pay to the state, for the privilege of exercising its corporate franchises within this state, a tax according to or measured by its net income, to be
 computed at the rate of 7.6 percent upon the basis of its net income for the next preceding income year, or if greater, the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(b) For calendar or fiscal years ending after June 30, 1973, the rate of tax shall be 9 percent instead of 7.6 percent as provided by subdivision (a).

(c) For calendar or fiscal years ending in 1980 to 1986, inclusive, the rate of tax shall be 9.6 percent.

(d) For calendar or fiscal years ending in 1987 to 1996, inclusive, and for any income year beginning before January 1, 1997, the tax rate shall be 9.3 percent.

(e) For any income year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, and before the income year identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), the tax rate shall be
 8.84 percent. The change in rate provided in this subdivision shall be made without proration otherwise required by Section 24251.

(f) (1) For the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the tax imposed under this section shall be the sum of both of the following:

(A) A tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate of 8.84 percent upon the basis of the net income for the next preceding income year, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(B) A tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate of 8.84 percent upon the basis of the net income for the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the tax imposed under this section shall be a tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate of 8.84 percent upon the basis of the net income for that taxable year, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 484.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23151.1.

Notwithstanding Section 23151, every corporation (except banks and financial corporations) doing business within the limits of this state and not exempted from taxation by the provisions of the Constitution of this state or by this part, shall annually pay to the state for the privilege of exercising its corporate franchises within this state, a tax determined as follows:

(a) With respect to corporations, other than those described in subdivision (b), which commence doing business within the
 state after December 31, 1971, and before January 1, 2000, the tax for the taxable year of commencement, whether or not for 12 full months, shall be the minimum franchise tax prescribed in Section 23153.

(b) If after December 31, 1972, a corporation commences to do business and ceases doing business in the same taxable year, the tax for that taxable year shall be according to or measured by its net income for the year, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23151.

(c) (1) With respect to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1972, and before January 1, 2000, other than the year of commencement described in subdivision (a) or (b) or the year of cessation described in subdivision (d), the tax for that taxable year shall be according to or measured by its net income for the next preceding taxable year, to be computed at the rate prescribed in
 Section 23151.

(2) With respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, (other than the first taxable year beginning on or after that date), the tax for the taxable year (including the taxable year of commencement and the taxable year of cessation) shall be according to or measured by its net income for the taxable year to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23151.

(d) With respect to corporations which cease doing business in a taxable year beginning after December 31, 1972, and before January 1, 2000, other than those described in subdivision (b), the tax for the taxable year of cessation shall be:

(1) According to or measured by its net income for the next preceding taxable year, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23151, plus

(2) According to or measured by its net income for the taxable year during which the corporation ceased doing business, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23151.

(e) In any event, the tax for any taxable year shall not be less than the minimum tax provided for in Section 23153 for that taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23151.2.

Notwithstanding Section 23151, every corporation (except banks and financial corporations) not exempted from taxation by the provisions of the Constitution of this state or by this part which dissolves or withdraws, shall pay a tax for its taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal according to or measured by its net income for the taxable year in which it ceased doing business, unless that income has previously been included in the measure of tax for any taxable year, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23151 for its taxable year of
 dissolution or withdrawal. In any event, the tax for the taxable year of its dissolution or withdrawal shall not be less than the minimum tax provided for in Section 23153 for that taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23153.

(a) Every corporation described in subdivision (b) shall be subject to the minimum franchise tax specified in subdivision (d) from the earlier of the date of incorporation, qualification, or commencing to do business within this state, until the effective date of dissolution or withdrawal as provided in Section 23331 or, if later, the date the corporation ceases to do business within the limits of this state.

(b) Unless expressly exempted by this part or the California Constitution, subdivision (a) shall apply to each of the following:

(1) Every corporation that is incorporated under the laws of this state.

(2) Every corporation that is qualified to transact intrastate business in this state pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(3) Every corporation that is doing business in this state.

(c) The following entities are not subject to the minimum franchise tax specified in this section:

(1) Credit unions.

(2) Nonprofit cooperative associations organized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code that have been issued the certificate of the board of supervisors prepared pursuant to Section 54042 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The association shall be exempt from the minimum franchise tax for five consecutive taxable years, commencing with the first taxable year for which the certificate is issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54042 of the Food and Agricultural Code. This paragraph only applies to nonprofit cooperative associations organized on or after January 1, 1994.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 23151, paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 23181, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23183, corporations subject to the minimum franchise tax shall pay annually to
 the state a minimum franchise tax of eight hundred dollars ($800).

(2) The minimum franchise tax shall be twenty-five dollars ($25) for each of the following:

(A) A corporation formed under the laws of this state whose principal business when formed was gold mining, which is inactive and has not done business within the limits of the state since 1950.

(B) A corporation formed under the laws of this state whose principal business when formed was quicksilver mining, which is inactive and has not done business within the limits of the state since 1971, or has been inactive for a period of 24 consecutive months or more.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (2), a corporation shall not be considered to have done business if it engages in business other than
 mining.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1999, and before January 1, 2000, every “qualified new corporation” shall pay annually to the state a minimum franchise tax of five hundred dollars ($500) for the second taxable year. This subdivision shall apply to any corporation that is a qualified new corporation and is incorporated on or after January 1, 1999, and before January 1, 2000.

(1) The determination of the gross receipts of a corporation, for purposes of this subdivision, shall be made by including the gross receipts of each member of the commonly controlled group, as defined in Section 25105, of which the corporation is a member.

(2) “Gross receipts, less returns and allowances reportable to this state,” means the sum of the gross receipts from the
 production of business income, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25120, and the gross receipts from the production of nonbusiness income, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 25120.

(3) “Qualified new corporation” means a corporation that is incorporated under the laws of this state or has qualified to transact intrastate business in this state, that begins business operations at or after the time of its incorporation and that reasonably estimates that it will have gross receipts, less returns and allowances, reportable to this state for the taxable year of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or less. “Qualified new corporation” does not include any corporation that began business operations as a sole proprietorship, a partnership, or any other form of business entity prior to its incorporation. This subdivision shall not apply to any corporation that reorganizes solely for the purpose of reducing its minimum franchise tax.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to limited partnerships, as defined in Section 17935, limited liability companies, as defined in Section 17941, limited liability partnerships, as described in Section 17948, charitable organizations, as described in Section 23703, regulated investment companies, as defined in Section 851 of the Internal Revenue Code, real estate investment trusts, as defined in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code, real estate mortgage investment conduits, as defined in Section 860D of the Internal Revenue Code, qualified Subchapter S subsidiaries, as defined in Section 1361(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or to the formation of any subsidiary corporation, to the extent applicable.

(5) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1999, and before January 1, 2000, if a corporation has qualified to pay five hundred dollars ($500) for the second
 taxable year under this subdivision, but in its second taxable year, the corporation’s gross receipts, as determined under paragraphs (1) and (2), exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000), an additional tax in the amount equal to three hundred dollars ($300) for the second taxable year shall be due and payable by the corporation on the due date of its return, without regard to extension, for that year.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), every corporation that incorporates or qualifies to do business in this state on or after January 1, 2000, shall not be subject to the minimum franchise tax for its first taxable year.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to limited partnerships, as defined in Section 17935, limited liability companies, as defined in Section 17941, limited liability partnerships, as described in Section 17948, charitable organizations, as
 described in Section 23703, regulated investment companies, as defined in Section 851 of the Internal Revenue Code, real estate investment trusts, as defined in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code, real estate mortgage investment conduits, as defined in Section 860D of the Internal Revenue Code, and qualified Subchapter S subsidiaries, as defined in Section 1361(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent applicable.

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to any corporation that reorganizes solely for the purpose of avoiding payment of its minimum franchise tax.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a domestic corporation, as defined in Section 167 of the Corporations Code, that files a certificate of dissolution in the office of the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1905 of the Corporations Code, prior to its amendment by the act amending this
 subdivision, and that does not thereafter do business shall not be subject to the minimum franchise tax for taxable years beginning on or after the date of that filing.

(h) The minimum franchise tax imposed by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall not be increased by the Legislature by more than 10 percent during any calendar year.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, a corporation that is a small business solely owned by a deployed member of the United States Armed Forces shall not be subject to the minimum franchise tax for any taxable year the owner is deployed and the corporation operates at a loss or ceases operation.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may promulgate regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of
 this subdivision, including a definition for “ceases operation.”

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, all of the following definitions apply:

(A) “Deployed” means being called to active duty or active service during a period when a Presidential Executive order specifies that the United States is engaged in combat or homeland defense. “Deployed” does not include either of the following:

(i) Temporary duty for the sole purpose of training or processing.

(ii) A permanent change of station.

(B) “Operates at a loss” means negative net income as defined in Section 24341.

(C) “Small business” means a corporation with total
 income from all sources derived from, or attributable to, the state of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less.

(4) This subdivision shall become inoperative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   (AB 308)   Effective October 2, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23154.

The tax imposed under this chapter is in lieu of all ad valorem taxes and assessments of every kind and nature upon the general corporate franchises of the corporations taxable under this chapter but is not in lieu of any taxes or assessments upon real property interests not otherwise exempted from taxation or assessment, that are created by special franchises owned, held, or used by those corporations. All those real property interests, not otherwise exempted from taxation or assessment that are created by those special franchises shall be assessed annually
 by the board, at their actual value, in the same manner as is provided for the assessment of other property to be assessed by that board under Section 19 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, and shall be subject to taxation to the same extent and in the same manner as other property assessed under that constitutional provision by the board. For purposes of assessing a real property interest pursuant to the preceding sentence, the value of intangible assets or rights shall not enhance or be reflected in the value of that real property interest, except that the real property interest may be assessed and valued by assuming the presence of intangible assets and rights necessary to put the real property interest to beneficial or productive use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 498, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

23155.

In the event that taxes, interest and penalties have been or shall be assessed against, paid by or collected from a taxpayer under a subdivision of Section 23151.1, which assessment, payment or collection should have been made under a different subdivision, such taxes, interest and penalties shall be considered as having been assessed, paid or collected under such different subdivision as of the date or dates they were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------

23156.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall abate, upon written request by a qualified nonprofit corporation, unpaid qualified taxes, interest, and penalties for the taxable years in which the qualified nonprofit corporation certifies, under penalty of perjury, that it was not doing business, within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 23101.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified nonprofit corporation” means a nonprofit corporation identified in Section 5059, 5060, or 5061 of the Corporations Code or a foreign nonprofit corporation, as defined in Section 5053 of the Corporations Code that has qualified to transact intrastate business in this state and that satisfies any of the following conditions:

(A) Was operating and previously obtained tax-exempt status with the Franchise Tax Board, but had its tax-exempt status revoked under subdivision (a) of Section 23777.

(B) Was operating and previously obtained tax-exempt status with the Internal Revenue Service, but had its tax-exempt status revoked under Section 6033(j) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(C) Was never doing
 business, within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 23101, in this state at any time after the time of its incorporation in this state.

(2) “Qualified taxes, interest, and penalties” means tax imposed under Section 23153 and associated interest and penalties, and any penalties imposed under Section 19141. “Qualified taxes, interest, and penalties” does not include tax imposed under Section 23501 or 23731, or associated interest or penalties.

(c) The qualified corporation must establish that it has ceased all business operations at the time of filing the request for abatement under this section.

(d) (1) The abatement of unpaid qualified tax, interest, and penalties is conditioned on the dissolution of the qualified corporation within 12 months from the date of filing the request for
 abatement under this section.

(2) If the qualified corporation is not dissolved within 12 months from the date of filing the request for abatement or restarts business operations at any time after requesting abatement under this section, the abatement of qualified tax, interest, and penalties under this section shall be canceled and the qualified taxes, interest, and penalties subject to that abatement shall be treated as if the abatement never occurred.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe any rules and regulations that may be necessary or appropriate to implement this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 291.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Tax on Banks and Financial Corporations [23181. - 23188.]

23181.

(a) Except as otherwise provided herein, an annual tax is hereby imposed upon every bank doing business within the limits of this state according to or measured by its net income, upon the basis of its net income for the next preceding income year at the rate provided under Section 23186.

(b) If a bank commences to do business and ceases doing business in the same taxable year, the tax for such taxable year shall be according to or measured by its net income for such year,
 at the rate provided under Section 23186.

(c) With respect to a bank, other than a bank described in subdivision (b), which ceases doing business after December 31, 1972, the tax for the taxable year of cessation shall be:

(1) According to or measured by its net income for the next preceding income year, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23186, plus

(2) According to or measured by its net income for the income year during which the bank ceased doing business, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23186.

(d) In the case of a bank which ceased doing business before January 1, 1973, but dissolves or withdraws on such date or thereafter, the tax for the taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal shall be according to or measured by
 its net income for the income year during which the bank ceased doing business, unless such income has previously been included in the measure of tax for any taxable year, to be computed at the rate prescribed under Section 23186 for the taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal.

(e) Commencing with income years ending in 1980, every bank shall pay to the state a minimum tax (determined in accordance with Section 23153) or the measured tax imposed on its income, whichever is greater.

(f) (1) For the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the tax imposed under this section shall be the sum of both of the following:

(A) A tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate provided under Section 23186 upon the basis of the net income for the next preceding
 income year, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(B) A tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate provided under Section 23186 upon the basis of the net income for the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the tax imposed under this section shall be a tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate provided under Section 23186 upon the basis of the net income for that taxable year, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23182.

The tax imposed under this part upon banks and financial corporations is in lieu of all other taxes and licenses, state, county and municipal, upon the said banks and financial corporations except taxes upon their real property, local utility user taxes, sales and use taxes, state energy resources surcharge, state emergency telephone users surcharge, and motor vehicle and other vehicle registration license fees and any other tax or license fee imposed by the state upon vehicles, motor vehicles or the operation thereof.

The changes in this section made by the 1979–80 Legislature with respect to sales and use taxes apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 1980, and the remaining changes apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 1981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

23183.

(a) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2000, an annual tax is hereby imposed upon every financial corporation doing business within the limits of this state and taxable under the provisions of Section 27 of Article XIII of the Constitution of this state, for the privilege of exercising its corporate franchises within this state, according to or measured by its net income, upon the basis of its net income for the next preceding income year at the rate provided under Section 23186.

(b) For purposes of this article, the term “financial corporation” does not include any corporation, including a wholly owned subsidiary of a bank or bank holding company, if the principal business activity of such entity consists of leasing tangible personal property.

(c) (1) For the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the tax imposed under this section shall be the sum of both of the following:

(A) A tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate provided under Section 23186 upon the basis of the net income for the next preceding income year, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(B) A tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate provided
 under Section 23186 upon the basis of the net income for the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the tax imposed under this section shall be a tax according to or measured by net income, to be computed at the rate provided under Section 23186 upon the basis of the net income for that taxable year, but not less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23183.1.

Notwithstanding Section 23183, every financial corporation doing business within the limits of this state and not exempted from taxation by the Constitution of this state or by this part, shall annually pay to the state for the privilege of exercising its corporate franchises within this state, a tax determined as follows:

(a) If a financial corporation commences to do business and ceases doing business in the same taxable year, the tax for that taxable year shall be according to or measured
 by its net income for that year, at the rate provided under Section 23186.

(b) (1) With respect to taxable years beginning before January 1, 2000, other than the year of commencement described in subdivision (a) or the year of cessation described in subdivision (c), a tax according to or measured by its net income, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23186 upon the basis of its net income for the next preceding income year.

(2) With respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000 (other than the first taxable year beginning on or after that date), the tax for the taxable year (including the taxable year of commencement and the taxable year of cessation) shall be a tax according to or measured by its net income, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23186 upon the basis of its net income for the taxable year.

(c) With respect to financial corporations, which cease doing business in a taxable year beginning before January 1, 2000, other than those described in subdivision (a), the tax for the taxable year of cessation shall be:

(1) According to or measured by its net income for the next preceding income year to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23186, plus

(2) According to or measured by its net income for the income year during which the financial corporation ceased doing business, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23186.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23183.2.

Notwithstanding Section 23183, every financial corporation not exempted from taxation by the provisions of the Constitution of this state or by this part which dissolves or withdraws, shall pay a tax for its taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal according to or measured by its net income for the taxable year in which it ceased doing business, to be computed at the rate prescribed in Section 23186 for its taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal, unless the income has previously been included in the measure of tax for any taxable
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23186.

For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 1995, the rate of tax on banks and financial corporations shall be the rate of tax specified in Section 23151, plus 2 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23187.

Upon the request of a taxpayer under this chapter, the tax-collecting officer of a county, city, or other political subdivision of this State, shall furnish an official receipt for real and personal property taxes paid to him setting forth a description of such property, the assessed valuation thereof, the rate of tax, the amount of taxes paid, and the beginning and ending of the year for which the taxes are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

23188.

In the event that taxes, interest, or penalties have been or shall be assessed against, paid by, or collected from a taxpayer under a subdivision of Section 23181 or 23183.1, which assessment, payment, or collection should have been made under a different subdivision of those sections, the taxes, interest, or penalties shall be considered as having been assessed, paid, or collected under that different subdivision as of the date or dates they were made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Credit for Prepaid Tax [23201. - 23204.]

23201.

(a) In the case of a taxpayer whose tax for the first taxable year was computed under Sections 23222 to 23224, inclusive (or corresponding sections of prior laws), there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax for the taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal, the excess of the tax paid over the minimum tax for the first taxable year which constituted a full 12 months of doing business in this state and whose income has been included in the measure of tax of a succeeding taxable year.

(b) Any credit previously allowed under this section or for a year in which the taxpayer ceased
 doing business shall not be allowed again in computing a credit under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------

23202.
